Alaska statutes. Title 29. Municipal Government.
Article 1. Municipal Property Tax.
Sec. 29.45.040.
Property tax equivalency payments.

A resident of the state who rents a permanent place of abode is eligible for a tax equivalency payment from the state through the department if the resident is

at least 65 years old;

a disabled veteran; or

at least 60 years old and the widow or widower of a person who was eligible for payment under (1) or (2) of this subsection.

For purposes of determining the amount of a payment to an eligible person, the department shall calculate at the rate of one percent per mill a property tax equivalent percentage for each municipality that levies a property tax. The property tax equivalent percentage applied to the annual rent charged to the applicant equals the property tax equivalency payment payable under this section.

To obtain a tax equivalency payment the eligible resident must apply to the department for payment for the preceding year by January 15 of each year on forms and in the manner prescribed by the department. The department for good cause shown may waive an applicant’s failure to make timely application for a tax equivalency payment and accept the application as if timely filed. Each applicant shall submit with the application rental receipts or, if rental receipts are not available, other evidence satisfactory to the department for determination of the fact of payment of rent and the amount paid. A disabled veteran shall submit with the application evidence of the disability rating.

If two or more persons occupy a residence as tenants, not all of whom are eligible for a tax equivalency payment under this section, the assessor shall determine equitable partial payments to be made to the eligible tenants. However, a tax equivalency payment to an eligible applicant may not be reduced because the spouse is less than 65 years of age or is not a disabled veteran. If all occupants in a residence are eligible for a tax equivalency payment under this section, the occupants shall decide between and among themselves which shall receive payment.

If appropriations are not sufficient to fully fund tax equivalency payments under this section, the amount available shall be distributed pro rata among eligible residents.

In this section, “disabled veteran” has the meaning given in AS

29.45.030(i)

.

History.

(§ 12 ch 74 SLA 1985; am §§ 3, 4 ch 91 SLA 1985)

Revisor’s notes. —

The amendment made to (a) of this section by § 3, ch. 91, SLA 1985 was enacted as an amendment to AS 29.73.060(a). Chapter 74, SLA 1985 enacted AS

29.45.040

and repealed AS 29.73.060.
The effective date of both 1985 Acts is January 1, 1986.
The legislature’s intent to amend the tax equivalency provisions has been recognized by treating the amendment to AS 29.73.060(a) as an amendment to (a) of this section. Subsection (e) of this section was enacted as AS 29.73.060(f) and renumbered in 1985.
Subsection (f) of this section was enacted as (e) and renumbered in 1985.

Administrative Code. —

For senior citizen property tax equivalency payment, see 3 AAC 136.

Sec. 29.45.045.
Reimbursement payments. [Repealed, § 6 ch 70 SLA 1986.]

Sec. 29.45.046.
River habitat protection tax credit.

Unless prohibited by municipal charter, a municipality may by ordinance provide for a river habitat protection credit to be applied to offset a portion of the property taxes due on land, or an interest in land taxable under this chapter, upon which an improvement has been constructed that aids in

protecting a river from degradation of fish habitat due to public or private use; or

restoring riparian fish habitat along or in a river that has been damaged by land use practices.

The amount of a river habitat protection credit shall be based upon a percentage of the verifiable costs of the improvement and may not exceed 50 percent of the total amount of taxes levied upon the land or upon the taxable interest in the land during a single tax year, but the credit may be granted for more than one year. If the credit is granted for more than one year and the land or taxable interest in the land is conveyed, the portion of the credit remaining is extinguished. The ordinance may limit the availability of a credit to some, but not all types of improvements for which a credit may be granted under this section and to some, but not all areas of the municipality. A credit may only be granted for an improvement that has been constructed in compliance with state and federal laws. A credit may not be granted for an improvement

required under state or federal law; or

located more than 150 feet from the mean high tide line or ordinary high water line; in this paragraph, “ordinary high water line” means that line on the shore of the nontidal portion of a river or stream that reflects the highest level of water during an ordinary year and is established by fluctuations of water and indicated by physical characteristics such as a clear, natural line impressed on the bank, shelving, changes in the character of soil, destruction of terrestrial vegetation, the presence of litter and debris, or other appropriate means that consider the characteristics of the surrounding area.

[Repealed, § 3 ch 41 SLA 1995.]

Before an ordinance is adopted under (a) of this section, it must be approved by the commissioner of fish and game. The commissioner of fish and game shall approve a proposed ordinance if the improvements for which a credit is authorized aid in protecting or restoring habitat as required under this section without regard to the percentage of the total protection or restoration that could be achieved by ideal improvement measures. Within 60 days after receipt of a proposed ordinance, the commissioner of fish and game shall notify the municipality in writing as to whether the proposed ordinance is approved or disapproved and, if the proposed ordinance is disapproved, shall state the basis for that determination.

History.

(§ 1 ch 40 SLA 1994; am §§ 1 — 3 ch 41 SLA 1995; am § 1 ch 34 SLA 2000)

Sec. 29.45.047.
Air quality improvement tax credit.

A municipality may by ordinance provide for a single or multiple year air quality improvement tax credit to offset a portion of the property taxes due on real property improvements made during the immediately preceding tax year before the municipality’s initial approval of the tax credit, including new construction, refurbishments, remodels, and renovations that aid in improving the air quality in the municipality. The municipality shall establish eligibility criteria for the credit in the ordinance adopted under this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 15 SLA 2020)

Effective dates. —

Section 1, ch. 15, SLA 2020, which enacted this section, took effect on July 19, 2020.

Sec. 29.45.048.
Air quality improvement tax credit. [Repealed, § 2, ch. 26, SLA 2009.]

Sec. 29.45.049.
Energy efficient construction tax credit.

A municipality may by ordinance provide for a single or multiple year energy efficient construction tax credit to offset a portion of the property taxes due on real property improvements made during the immediately preceding tax year before the municipality’s initial approval of the tax credit, including energy efficient new construction, refurbishments, remodels, and renovations. The municipality shall establish eligibility criteria for the credit in the ordinance adopted under this section.

History.

(§ 2 ch 15 SLA 2020)

Effective dates. —

Section 2, ch. 15, SLA 2020, which enacted this section, took effect on July 19, 2020.

Sec. 29.45.050.
Optional exemptions and exclusions.

A municipality may exclude or exempt or partially exempt residential property from taxation by ordinance ratified by the voters at an election. An exclusion or exemption authorized by this subsection may be applied with respect to taxes levied in a service area to fund the special services. An exclusion or exemption authorized by this subsection may not exceed the assessed value of $50,000 for any one residence except that a municipality may, by ordinance, annually adjust their voter-authorized exemption by the amount calculated by the State Assessor to reflect the increase, if any, in the annual average cost of living, using the U.S. Department of Labor CPI-U for Anchorage.

A municipality may by ordinance

classify and exempt from taxation

the property of an organization not organized for business or profit-making purposes and used exclusively for community purposes if the income derived from rental of that property does not exceed the actual cost to the owner of the use by the renter;

historic sites, buildings, and monuments;

land of a nonprofit organization used for agricultural purposes if rights to subdivide the land are conveyed to the state and the conveyance includes a covenant restricting use of the land to agricultural purposes only; rights conveyed to the state under this subparagraph may be conveyed by the state only in accordance with AS

38.05.069(c)

;

all or any portion of private ownership interests in property that, based upon a written agreement with the University of Alaska, is used exclusively for student housing for the University of Alaska; property may be exempted from taxation under this subparagraph for no longer than 30 years unless the exemption is specifically extended by ordinance adopted within the six months before the expiration of that period;

a residential renewable energy system that is used to develop means of energy production using energy sources other than fossil or nuclear fuel, including windmills and water and solar energy devices located in the municipality;

classify as to type and exempt or partially exempt some or all types of personal property from ad valorem taxes.

The provisions of (a) of this section notwithstanding,

a borough may, by ordinance, adjust its property tax structure in whole or in part to the property tax structure of a city in the borough, including adjustments excluding personal property from taxation, establishing exemptions, and extending the redemption period;

a home rule or first class city has the same power to grant exemptions or exclude property from borough taxes that it has as to city taxes if

the exemptions or exclusions have been adopted as to city taxes; and

the city appropriates to the borough sufficient money to equal revenue lost by the borough because of the exemptions or exclusions, the amount to be determined annually by the assembly;

a city in a borough may, by ordinance, adjust its property tax structure in whole or in part to the property tax structure of the borough, including exempting or partially exempting property from taxation.

Exemptions or exclusions from property tax that have been granted by a home rule municipality in addition to exemptions authorized or required by law, and that are in effect on September 10, 1972, and not later withdrawn, are not affected by this chapter.

A municipality may by ordinance classify and exempt or partially exempt from taxation privately owned land, wet land and water areas for which a scenic, conservation, or public recreation use easement is granted to a governmental body. To be eligible for a tax exemption, or partial exemption, the easement must be in perpetuity. The easement is automatically terminated before an eminent domain taking of fee simple title or less than fee simple title to the property, so that the property owner is compensated at a rate that does not reflect the easement grant. The municipality may provide by ordinance that, if the area subject to the easement is sold, leased, or otherwise disposed of for uses incompatible with the easement or if the easement is conveyed to the owner of the property, the owner must pay to the municipality all or a portion of the amount of the tax exempted, with interest.

A municipality may by ordinance exempt from taxation all or part of the increase in assessed value of improvements to real property if an increase in assessed value is directly attributable to alteration of the natural features of the land, or new maintenance, repair, or renovation of an existing structure, and if the alteration, maintenance, repair, or renovation, when completed, enhances the exterior appearance or aesthetic quality of the land or structure. An exemption may not be allowed under this subsection for the construction of an improvement to a structure if the principal purpose of the improvement is to increase the amount of space for occupancy or nonresidential use in the structure or for the alteration of land as a consequence of construction activity. An exemption provided in this subsection may continue for up to four years from the date the improvement is completed, or from the date of approval for the exemption by the local assessor, whichever is later.

A municipality may by ordinance exempt from taxation all or part of the increase in assessed value of improvements to a single-family dwelling if the principal purpose of the improvement is to increase the amount of space for occupancy. An exemption provided in this subsection may continue for up to two years from the date the improvement is completed, or from the date of approval of an application for the exemption by the local assessor, whichever is later.

A municipality may by ordinance partially or wholly exempt land from a tax for fire protection service and fire protection facilities and may levy the tax only on improvements, including personal property affixed to the improvements.

A municipality may by ordinance approved by the voters exempt from taxation the assessed value that exceeds $150,000 of real property owned and occupied as a permanent place of abode by a resident who is

65 years of age or older;

a disabled veteran, including a person who was disabled in the line of duty while serving in the Alaska Territorial Guard; or

at least 60 years old and a widow or widower of a person who qualified for an exemption under (1) or (2) of this subsection.

A municipality may by ordinance approved by the voters exempt real or personal property in a taxing unit used in processing timber after it has been delivered to the processing site from up to 75 percent of the rate of taxes levied on other property in that taxing unit. An ordinance adopted under this subsection may not provide for an exemption that exceeds five years in duration. In this subsection, “taxing unit” means a municipality and includes

a service area in a unified municipality or borough;

the entire area outside cities in a borough; and

a differential tax zone in a city.

A municipality may by ordinance approved by the voters exempt from taxation pollution control facilities that meet requirements of the United States Environmental Protection Agency or the Department of Environmental Conservation. An ordinance adopted under this subsection may not provide for an exemption that exceeds five years in duration.

A municipality may by ordinance exempt from taxation an interest, other than record ownership, in real property of an individual residing in the property if the property has been developed, improved, or acquired with federal funds for low-income housing and is owned or managed as low-income housing by the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation under AS

18.55.100

—

18.55.960

or by a regional housing authority formed under AS

18.55.996

. However, the corporation may make payments to the municipality or political subdivision for improvements, services, and facilities furnished by it for the benefit of a housing project, and this subsection does not prohibit a municipality from receiving those payments or any payments in lieu of taxes authorized under federal law.

A municipality may by ordinance partially or totally exempt all or some types of economic development property from taxation for a designated period. Except as otherwise provided by an ordinance enacted by the municipality before January 1, 2017, a municipality that is a school district may only exempt all or a portion of the amount of taxes that exceeds the amount levied on other property for the school district’s required local contribution under AS

14.17.410(b)(2)

. A municipality may by ordinance permit deferral of payment of taxes on all or some types of economic development property for a designated period. A municipality may not apply an exemption or deferral under this subsection to taxes levied for special services in a service area that is supervised by a board under AS

29.35.460

. A municipality may adopt an ordinance under this subsection only if, before it is adopted, copies of the proposed ordinance made available at a public hearing on it contain written notice that the ordinance, if adopted, may be repealed by the voters through referendum. An ordinance adopted under this subsection must include specific eligibility requirements and require a written application for each exemption or deferral. In this subsection, “economic development property” means real or personal property, including developed property conveyed under 43 U.S.C. 1601 et seq. (Alaska Native Claims Settlement Act),

to which one or more of the following apply:

the property has not previously been taxed as real or personal property by the municipality;

the property is used in a trade or business in a way that

creates employment in the municipality;

generates sales outside of the municipality of goods or services produced in the municipality; or

materially reduces the importation of goods or services from outside the municipality;

an exemption or deferral on the property enables a significant capital investment in physical infrastructure that

expands the tax base of the municipality; and

will generate property tax revenue after the exemption expires; or

that has not been used in the same trade or business in another municipality for at least six months before the application for deferral or exemption is filed; this paragraph does not apply if the property was used in the same trade or business in an area that has been annexed to the municipality within six months before the application for deferral or exemption is filed; this paragraph does not apply to inventories.

A municipality may by ordinance classify as to type inventories intended for export outside the state and partially or totally exempt all or some types of those inventories from taxation. The ordinance may provide for different levels of exemption for different classifications of inventories. An ordinance adopted under this subsection must include specific eligibility requirements and require a written application, which shall be a public document, for each exemption.

A municipality may by ordinance partially or totally exempt all or some types of deteriorated property from taxation for up to 10 years beginning on or any time after the day substantial rehabilitation, renovation, demolition, removal, or replacement of any structure on the property begins. A municipality may by ordinance permit deferral of payment of taxes on all or some types of deteriorated property for up to five years beginning on or any time after the day substantial rehabilitation, renovation, demolition, removal, or replacement of any structure on the property begins. However, if the entire ownership of property for which a deferral has been granted is transferred, all tax payments deferred under this subsection are immediately due, and the deferral ends. Otherwise, deferred tax payments become due as specified by the municipality at the time the deferral is granted. The amount deferred each year is a lien on that property for that year. Only one exemption and only one deferral may be granted to the same property under this subsection, and, if an exemption and a deferral are granted to the same property, both may not be in effect on the same portion of the property during the same time. An ordinance adopted under this subsection must include specific eligibility requirements and require a written application for each exemption or deferral. An application for a deferral must specify when payment of taxes for each year of deferral will become due, together with an explanation of the reasons for each proposed date for consideration by the municipality. In this subsection, “deteriorated property” means real property that, either at the time of application for exemption or deferral or at the time of completion of the project for which an exemption or deferral is requested, is

residential property located in a deteriorating or deteriorated area with boundaries that have been determined by the municipality, if the property is owned by an entity that owns at least two residential properties and eight or more residential units among those properties in that deteriorating or deteriorated area; or

commercial property not used for residential purposes or that is multi-unit residential property with at least eight residential units, and that meets one of the following requirements:

within the last five years, has been the subject of an order by a government agency requiring environmental remediation of the property or requiring the property to be vacated, condemned, or demolished by reason of noncompliance with laws, ordinances, or regulations;

has a structure on it not less than 15 years of age that has not undergone substantial rehabilitation, renovation, demolition, removal, or replacement, subject to any conditions prescribed in the ordinance; or

is located in a deteriorating or deteriorated area with boundaries that have been determined by the municipality.

A municipality may by ordinance partially or totally exempt from taxation a private leasehold, contract, or other interest held by or through an applicant or proposed applicant in any property, assets, project, or development project owned by the Alaska Industrial Development and Export Authority under AS 44.88. Nothing in this subsection prohibits a municipality from entering into an agreement and receiving payments in lieu of taxes authorized under AS

44.88.140(b)

.

A municipality may by ordinance partially or totally exempt from taxation land from which timber is harvested that is infested by insects or at risk of being infested by insects due to an infestation in the area in which the land is located. A municipality may provide that an exemption for land under this subsection applies only to increases in assessed value that result from the timber harvest. A municipality may by ordinance partially or totally exempt from taxation improvements to real property, including personal property affixed to the improvements, if the improvements are

located on land from which timber is harvested that is infested by insects or at risk of being infested by insects due to an infestation in the area in which the land is located; and

used for or necessary to the harvest of the timber that is infested by insects or in danger of insect infestation.

A municipality may by ordinance exempt from taxation an amount not to exceed $10,000 of the assessed value of real property owned and occupied as a permanent place of abode by a resident who provides in the municipality volunteer (1) fire fighting services and is certified as a firefighter by the Department of Public Safety, or (2) emergency medical services or mobile intensive care paramedic services and is certified or licensed under AS

18.08.082

. If two or more individuals are eligible for an exemption for the same property, not more than two exemptions may be granted.

A municipality may by ordinance partially or wholly exempt from taxation the real property owned and occupied as a permanent place of abode by a resident who is the widow or widower of a member of the armed forces of the United States injured serving on active duty while eligible for hostile fire or imminent danger pay who dies because of the injury or complications related to the injury or its treatment. The ordinance must include requirements for determining eligibility for the exemption and a procedure for applying for the exemption.

A municipality may by ordinance approved by the voters partially or totally exempt from taxation a farm structure used exclusively for farming activity, or purposes directly related to farming activity, if the farm structure is owned or leased by a person that is actively engaged in farming and that derives at least 10 percent of the person’s yearly gross income from farming activity, and the structure is used for

the growing, storage, or processing of grains, fruits, vegetables, or other crops intended for human consumption and produced by the owner’s or lessee’s farming activity;

the storage or processing of

feed for livestock, poultry, or other animals used in the owner’s or lessee’s farming activity;

milk or milk products produced by the owner’s or lessee’s farming activity; or

stabling or milking the owner’s or lessee’s dairy animals.

A municipality may by ordinance classify and exempt or partially exempt from taxation all or a portion of privately owned real property rented or leased for use as a charter school established under AS

14.03.250

.

A municipality may by ordinance exempt or partially exempt from taxation for up to 10 years property in a military facility zone that creates or supports industry, development, or educational or training opportunities beneficial to a facility. An ordinance adopted under this subsection must include specific eligibility requirements and require a written application for each exemption. In this subsection, “facility” and “military facility zone” have the meanings given in AS

26.30.900

.

A municipality may by ordinance partially or wholly exempt from taxation all or a portion of the increase in assessed value directly attributable to the subdivision of a single parcel of property into three or more parcels and any improvements made to the property necessitated by its subdivision. An ordinance adopted under this subsection may not provide for an exemption that exceeds five years in duration. A municipality may also by ordinance provide that

the exemption is terminated when

a lot in the subdivision is sold; or

a residential or commercial use is established on a lot in the subdivision; or

the exemption continues for the unsold lots in the subdivision after

a lot in the subdivision is sold; or

a residential or commercial use is established on a lot in the subdivision.

A municipality may by ordinance exempt from taxation up to two percent of the assessed value of a structure if the structure contains a fire protection system that is approved under AS

18.70.081

, in operating condition, and incorporated as a fixture or part of the structure. An exemption under this subsection is limited to an amount that does not exceed two percent of the value of the structure based on the assessment

for 1981, if the fire protection system was a fixture of the structure on January 1, 1981; or

as of January 1 of the year immediately following the installation of the fire protection system, if the fire protection system became a fixture of the structure after January 1, 1981.

In this section, “farming activity” means raising and harvesting crops; feeding, breeding, and managing livestock; dairying; or any combination of those activities.

History.

(§ 12 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 1 ch 103 SLA 1985; am § 5 ch 70 SLA 1986; am § 1 ch 151 SLA 1988; am § 2 ch 73 SLA 1989; am § 1 ch 98 SLA 1989; am § 15 ch 93 SLA 1991; am § 107 ch 4 FSSLA 1992; am § 1 ch 66 SLA 1993; am § 1 ch 7 SLA 1994; am § 1 ch 65 SLA 1994; am § 1 ch 40 SLA 1995; am § 1 ch 70 SLA 1998; am §§ 1, 2 ch 8 SLA 1999; am § 4 ch 117 SLA 2000; am § 1 ch 54 SLA 2002; am § 1 ch 64 SLA 2002; am §§ 2, 3 ch 140 SLA 2004; am § 40 ch 56 SLA 2005; am § 2 ch 44 SLA 2006; am § 1 ch 89 SLA 2008; am § 10 ch 83 SLA 2010; am § 1, 2012 Primary Election Ballot Measure 1; am § 1 ch 66 SLA 2013; am § 35 ch 15 SLA 2014; am § 1 ch 57 SLA 2014; am §§ 1, 2 ch 36 SLA 2015; am § 26 ch 3 SLA 2017; am §§ 5, 6 ch 9 SLA 2017; am § 16 ch 29 SLA 2021)

Delayed repeal of subsections (t) and (y). —

Under sec. 2,
ch. 66, SLA 2013, subsections (t) and (y) are repealed September 26, 2023.

Revisor's notes. —

Subsection (h) of this section was enacted as AS 29.53.025(h).
Renumbered in 1985.
Chapter 103, SLA 1985 also enacted, in § 2, AS 29.63.066, which provides an exemption identical to that set out in (h) of this section from taxes levied under former AS 29.63, repealed by § 88, ch. 74, SLA 1985.
The provisions of former AS 29.63 were substantially incorporated in AS 29.45, and the addition of subsection (h) to AS

29.45.050

makes it unnecessary to codify § 2, ch. 103, SLA 1985 to achieve the legislature’s purpose.

Subsection (r) was enacted as (q); relettered in 2002.

Subsection (u) was enacted as (v).
Relettered in 2014, at which time former (u) was relettered as (w) [now (y)].

Subsection (w) was enacted as (x); relettered in 2015, at which time former (w) was relettered as (x) [now y].

Subsection (x) was enacted as (y); relettered in 2017, at which time former (x) was relettered as (y).

Effect of amendments. —

The 2004 amendment, effective September 28, 2004, in subsection (a), inserted the second sentence, and substituted “subsection” for “section” and “$20,000” for “$10,000” in the last sentence; and, in subsection (o), substituted “10 years” for “five years” in the first sentence, inserted “demolition, removal” three times, added “meets one of the following requirements:” at the end of the introductory language, and inserted “within the last five years” and “environmental remediation of the property or requiring” in paragraph (1).

The 2005 amendment, effective June 25, 2005, updated a federal reference near the end of the introductory language in subsection (m).

The 2006 amendment, effective August 23, 2006, inserted “entire” in the third sentence of subsection (o), deleted “or, if ownership of any part of the property is transferred, all tax payments are immediately due” at the end of that sentence, and added the fourth and eighth sentences.

The 2008 amendment, effective September 11, 2008, added subsection (s).

The 2010 amendment, effective September 14, 2010, added (b)(1)(E).

The 2012 amendment, effective December 12, 2012, in (a), substituted “$50,000” for “$20,000”, and added the language beginning “except that a municipality may” to the end of the subsection.

The 2013 amendment, effective September 26, 2013, added (t) and (u) [now (y)].

The first 2014 amendment, effective July 1, 2014, added (v) [now (u)].

The second 2014 amendment, effective October 5, 2014, added (v).

The 2015 amendment, effective September 25, 2015, in (o), added “, either at the time of application for exemption or deferral or at the time of completion of the project for which an exemption or deferral is requested,” near the end of the introductory language, added (o)(1), in (o)(2)(B), substituted “that has not undergone substantial rehabilitation” for “that has undergone substantial rehabilitation”, and made related changes; added (x) [now (w)].

The first 2017 amendment, effective June 13, 2017, rewrote (m), which read, "(m) A municipality may by ordinance partially or totally exempt all or some types of economic development property from taxation for up to five years. The municipality may provide for renewal of the exemption under conditions established in the ordinance. However, under a renewal, a municipality that is a school district may only exempt all or a portion of the amount of taxes that exceeds the amount levied on other property for the school district. A municipality may by ordinance permit deferral of payment of taxes on all or some types of economic development property for up to five years. The municipality may provide for renewal of the deferral under conditions established in the ordinance. A municipality may adopt an ordinance under this subsection only if, before it is adopted, copies of the proposed ordinance made available at a public hearing on it contain written notice that the ordinance, if adopted, may be repealed by the voters through referendum. An ordinance adopted under this subsection must include specific eligibility requirements and require a written application for each exemption or deferral. In this subsection “economic development property” means real or personal property, including 43 U.S.C. 1601 et seq. (Alaska Native Claims Settlement Act), that (1) has not previously been taxed as real or personal property by the municipality; (2) is used in a trade or business in a way that (A) creates employment in the municipality; (B) generates sales outside of the municipality of goods or services produced in the municipality; or (C) materially reduces the importation of goods or services from outside the municipality; and (3) has not been used in the same trade or business in another municipality for at least six months before the application for deferral or exemption is filed; this paragraph does not apply if the property was used in the same trade or business in an area that has been annexed to the municipality within six months before the application for deferral or exemption is filed; this paragraph does not apply to inventories."; added (y) [now (x)].

The second 2017 amendment, effective July 1, 2017, in (c)(1), substituted “including adjustments” for “including but not limited to,” following “tax structure of a city in the borough,”; in (c)(2)(B), substituted “money to equal revenue” for “money to equal revenues”; in (c)(3), deleted “but not limited to” following “tax structure of the borough, including”.

The 2021 amendment, effective January 1, 2022, in (r), inserted “or mobile intensive care paramedic services” following “(2) emergency medical services” and “or licensed” following “is certified”.

Editor's notes. —

Section 4, ch. 44, SLA 2006, repealed § 2, ch. 8, SLA 1999, as amended by § 1, ch. 102, SLA 2002, and § 4, ch. 140, SLA 2004, which had directed the July 1, 2010, repeal of (o) of this section.

Sec. 29.45.051.
Tax deferral for certain subdivided property.

A municipality may by ordinance permit deferral of payment of taxes on all or a portion of the increase in assessed value directly attributable to

the subdivision of a single parcel of property into three or more parcels; and

any improvements made to the property necessitated by its subdivision.

A deferral from taxation allowed under (a) of this section shall be limited to a maximum period of five years. A municipality may by ordinance provide for the deferral of payment of taxes permitted under (a) of this section to be of a shorter duration.

Subject to (b) of this section, a municipality may also by ordinance provide that

the deferral is terminated when

a lot in the subdivision is sold; or

a residential or commercial building is built on a lot in the subdivision; or

the deferral continues for the unsold lots in the subdivision after

a lot in the subdivision is sold; or

a residential or commercial building is constructed on a lot in the subdivision.

History.

(§ 22 ch 64 SLA 2012)

Cross references. —

For severability of the provisions of ch. 64, SLA 2012, see § 32, ch. 64, SLA 2012 in the 2012 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effective dates. —

Section 34, ch. 64, SLA 2012 makes this section effective July 1, 2012.

Sec. 29.45.052.
Tax deferral for primary residences.

A municipality may by ordinance provide for the deferral of all taxes on property that is owned, in whole or in part, by an individual

who occupies and has occupied the property for at least 10 consecutive years as the individual’s primary residence; and

whose income is at or below federal poverty guidelines for the state set by the United States Department of Health and Human Services.

An individual must apply for each year that a deferral is sought and supply proof of eligibility for the deferral for that year in accordance with requirements set out in the ordinance that authorizes the deferral. Taxes for a year that are deferred do not become payable until ownership of the property is transferred from the individual who obtained the deferral. A municipality that provides for a deferral of property taxes under this subsection may not impose interest on the taxes deferred between the time the deferral is granted and the time the taxes become payable.

History.

(§ 3 ch 44 SLA 2006)

Cross references. —

For federal poverty guidelines, see aspe.hhs.gov/poverty-guidelines.

Sec. 29.45.053.
Exemption for certain residences of law enforcement officers.

A municipality may, by ordinance, provide for the designation of areas within its boundaries that are eligible for tax exemptions on parcels of residential property. The amount of the tax exemption provided in the ordinance may not exceed $150,000 of the assessed value of a parcel. The exemption may be granted for a parcel only if it is

entirely within an eligible area;

primarily used for residential purposes; and

owned and occupied as the primary place of abode by a law enforcement officer.

Only one exemption may be granted for the same parcel under an ordinance adopted under (a) of this section, and, if two or more individuals are eligible for an exemption for the same parcel, the individuals shall decide between or among themselves who is to receive the benefit of the exemption.

The municipality that adopts the ordinance under (a) of this section may not request state funds to cover any loss of revenue to the municipality caused by the ordinance.

The ordinance adopted under (a) of this section must define “law enforcement officer” to include only some or all positions listed in the definition of “peace officer” in AS

01.10.060

or in the definition of “police officer” in AS

18.65.290

. The ordinance may include other eligibility requirements for an area; however, an eligible area must

meet the eligibility requirements under a federal program of special assistance for urban development, neighborhood revitalization, or law enforcement, without regard to whether an application for the federal assistance on behalf of the area has been made or whether the area has received or is receiving the federal assistance;

have a statistically higher occurrence of crime than the municipality as a whole; the crime rate for an eligible area must be established in the ordinance; or

meet the requirements of (1) and (2) of this subsection.

The municipality may establish a specific area as an eligible area for purposes of this section only in the ordinance adopted under (a) of this section or by adopting a separate ordinance. The municipality is not required to establish as an eligible area for purposes of this section every area that meets the requirements of the ordinance that is adopted under (a) of this section.

History.

(§ 5 ch 10 SLA 2010)

Effective dates. —

Section 5, ch. 10, SLA 2010, which enacted this section, is effective July 30, 2010.

Sec. 29.45.055.
Levy of flat tax on personal property.

A municipality may by ordinance levy a flat tax on personal property that has been totally exempted from ad valorem taxes under AS

29.45.050(b)

. A municipality that levies a flat tax may classify the property as to type based on any characteristic and tax each item of property of the same type at a specific amount. A flat tax may be levied on all or on only some types of personal property. The flat tax ordinance must include a procedure under which the taxpayer may appeal the determination of ownership or classification of property subject to the tax. The municipality may establish procedures necessary to collect the tax.

Except as provided in (a) of this section, adoption of a flat tax does not affect the authority of a municipality to levy other taxes or impose fees on the same or other personal property or on the use, possession, sale, or lease of the same or other personal property.

History.

(§ 2 ch 40 SLA 1995)